Utah statutes.
73-10f-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Division" means the Division of Water Resources.

(2)  "Task force" means the Joint Gubernatorial/Legislative Task Force on the Bear River created in Laws of Utah 1989, Chapter 158.



Amended by Chapter 250, 2008 General Session

